Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 2. Governing Bodies.

Cross references. —

For requirement that the charter of a unified municipality include provisions relating to the subjects covered by AS

29.20.050

—

29.20.180

, see AS

29.06.320

(1)(E).

Sec. 29.20.050.
Legislative power.

The legislative power of a borough is vested in the assembly. The legislative power of a city is vested in the council.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.060.
Assembly composition and apportionment.

Assembly composition and apportionment shall be consistent with the equal representation standards of the Constitution of the United States.

The assembly of a newly incorporated borough is, after incorporation and until the adoption of an ordinance providing for a change in composition or apportionment, composed of the number of members and apportioned as set out in the incorporation petition approved by the voters. If the borough is already incorporated, the assembly shall be composed and apportioned in a manner that is consistent with the requirements of this section and prescribed by charter or ordinance.

An assembly may not provide for weighted voting.

A member of the assembly may not be elected or appointed by and from the council of a city in the borough.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.070.
Assembly composition and form of representation.

The assembly shall provide for its composition and for the form of its representation.

Not later than the first regular election that occurs after adoption of a final state redistricting plan under art. VI, sec. 10, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the assembly shall propose and submit to the voters of the borough, at that regular election or at a special election called for the purpose, one or more forms of assembly representation. The forms of representation that the assembly may submit to the voters are:

election of members of the assembly at large by the voters throughout the borough;

election of members of the assembly by district, including

election at large by the voters throughout the borough, but with a requirement that a candidate live in an election district established by the borough for election of assembly members; or

election from election districts established by the borough for the election of assembly members by the voters of a district;

election of members of the assembly both at large and by district.

A form of assembly representation that includes election of assembly members under (b)(2) or (b)(3) of this section shall be submitted to the voters of the borough with a plan of apportionment as required by AS

29.20.080

.

The assembly shall, within 30 days after certification of the results of the election held under this section, adopt an ordinance providing for

composition of the assembly;

the form of assembly representation that received the most votes; and

if applicable, the apportionment of assembly seats in accordance with the form of representation that received the most votes.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities, except it does not apply to a

unified municipality;

home rule borough if the home rule charter contains procedures for changing assembly composition and form of representation.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 84 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 29.20.080.
Assembly recomposition and reapportionment.

Not later than two months after adoption of a final state redistricting plan under art. VI, sec. 10, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the assembly shall determine and declare by resolution whether the existing apportionment of the assembly meets the standards of AS

29.20.060

. If the assembly submits to the voters a form of representation that includes election of assembly members under AS

29.20.070(b)(2)

or (3), the assembly shall submit with the proposition a proposed plan of apportionment that corresponds to the form of representation proposed. The assembly shall describe the plan of apportionment in the ballot proposition, and may present the plan in any manner that it believes accurately describes the apportionment that is proposed under the form of representation. If the assembly determines that its existing apportionment meets the standards of AS

29.20.060

, the assembly may include the existing apportionment as a proposed plan of apportionment of assembly seats that corresponds to a form of representation that is proposed.

The assembly shall provide, by ordinance, for a change in an existing apportionment of the assembly whenever it determines that the apportionment does not meet the standards of AS

29.20.060

. The assembly may provide, by ordinance, for a change in an existing apportionment of the assembly whenever a final state redistricting plan is changed as a result of federal or court action. At the same time a change in apportionment is provided for under this subsection, the assembly may, by ordinance, change the composition of the assembly.

If a petition signed by not less than 50 voters requests the assembly to determine whether the existing apportionment meets the standards for apportionment in AS

29.20.060

, and the petition contains evidence that the existing apportionment does not meet those standards, the assembly may make the determination requested. The assembly shall make a determination required by this subsection within two months of receipt of a petition that meets the requirements of this subsection.

An ordinance adopted by the assembly under (b) or (c) of this section shall be submitted to the voters for approval. In order for the ordinance to be approved it must receive the approval of a majority of the votes cast.

Within six months after a determination by the assembly under (b) or (c) of this section that the current apportionment should be changed the assembly shall adopt an ordinance providing for reapportionment and submit the ordinance to the voters. If, at the end of the six-month time period, an ordinance providing for reapportionment has not been approved by the voters and if the current apportionment does not meet the standards of AS

29.20.060

, the commissioner shall provide for the reapportionment in accordance with the standards of AS

29.20.060

by preparing an order of reapportionment and delivering the order to the borough mayor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 85 — 87 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 29.20.090.
Apportionment appeals.

A reapportionment ordinance approved by the voters, or a decision of the assembly that the standards of AS

29.20.060

do not require a change in apportionment, may be appealed to the commissioner. Fifty voters may submit a petition to the commissioner requesting the commissioner to determine whether the proposed reapportionment ordinance approved by the voters meets the standards of AS

29.20.060

or whether a decision of the assembly that the standards of AS 29.20.060 do not require a change of apportionment is correct. If the petition asks the commissioner to review an ordinance approved by the voters under AS

29.20.080(e)

, the petition shall be delivered to the commissioner not later than 20 days after certification of the election. If the petition asks the commissioner to review a decision of the assembly under AS

29.20.080(c)

, the petition shall be delivered to the commissioner within 20 days of the decision of the assembly.

The commissioner shall review the petition and may make the determination requested. The commissioner shall provide copies of the determination to the persons petitioning for appeal and to borough officials not later than 60 days after the commissioner receives the petition.

If the commissioner determines that the proposed reapportionment ordinance approved by the voters does not meet the standards of AS

29.20.060

, or if the commissioner determines that the decision of the assembly that the standards of AS

29.20.060

do not require a change of apportionment is not correct, the commissioner shall, by order, direct the assembly to prepare a reapportionment ordinance that meets the standards of AS 29.20.060 and submit the ordinance to the voters.

When the assembly has been directed by the commissioner to prepare a reapportionment ordinance under (c) of this section, the assembly shall, within two months after its receipt of the commissioner’s order, adopt an ordinance providing for reapportionment. The assembly shall submit an ordinance adopted under this subsection to the voters at an election held within 60 days after the date of adoption of the reapportionment ordinance.

If at the end of the time period provided under (d) of this section an ordinance providing for reapportionment has not been approved by the voters, the commissioner shall provide for the reapportionment of the assembly in accordance with the standards of AS

29.20.060

by preparing an order of reapportionment and delivering the order to the borough mayor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.100.
Judicial review and relief.

The commissioner may request the superior court to enforce a reapportionment order issued under AS

29.20.090(e)

.

Each of the following is subject to judicial review:

a plan of reapportionment approved by the voters under AS

29.20.080(a)

;

a determination by the assembly under AS

29.20.080

that the standards of AS

29.20.060

do not require a change in apportionment;

a reapportionment ordinance approved by the voters under AS

29.20.080(d)

;

a reapportionment order of the commissioner made under AS

29.20.090(c)

;

a reapportionment ordinance approved by the voters under AS

29.20.090(d)

; and

a reapportionment order of the commissioner made under AS

29.20.090(e)

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.110.
Effective date of apportionment.

A change in assembly apportionment or composition under AS

29.20.080

or

29.20.090

is effective beginning with the first regular election for members of the assembly that is held more than 60 days after the later of

approval of a reapportionment ordinance by the voters under AS

29.20.080(a)

,

29.20.080(e)

, or

29.20.090(d)

; or

the delivery to the mayor of a reapportionment order of the commissioner under AS

29.20.090(e)

.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to a borough in which a change in assembly composition or apportionment is subject to review and approval or determination of nonobjection by the Attorney General of the United States under 42 U.S.C. 1971-1974 (Voting Rights Act of 1965), as amended. A change in assembly composition or apportionment subject to review under 42 U.S.C. 1971-1974, as amended, is effective beginning with the first regular election for members of the assembly that is held more than 60 days after

receipt by the assembly of approval by the Attorney General of the United States of the proposed change in the composition or apportionment of the assembly;

the delivery to the mayor of a reapportionment order of the commissioner under AS

29.20.090(e)

; or

the last day on which the Attorney General of the United States may review a proposed change in the composition or apportionment of the assembly.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, to correct a manifest error in ch. 74, SLA 1985, a reference to AS

29.20.090(e)

was substituted for a reference to AS

29.20.090(d)

in (a)(2) of this section.

Sec. 29.20.120.
Applicability of apportionment provisions.

The provisions of AS

29.20.080

—

29.20.110

apply to home rule and general law municipalities, except they do not apply to a

unified municipality;

home rule borough if the borough, by home rule charter, provides for reapportionment of the assembly.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.130.
City council composition.

Each first class city has a council of six members elected by the voters at large. Each second class city has a council of seven members elected by the voters at large. The council of a first or second class city may by ordinance provide for election of members other than on an at-large basis for all members.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.140.
Qualifications.

A borough voter is eligible to be a member of the assembly and a city voter is eligible to be a member of the council. A member of the governing body who ceases to be a voter in the municipality immediately forfeits office.

A municipality may by ordinance establish a durational residency requirement not to exceed three years for members of the governing body.

A municipality may by ordinance establish district residency requirements for members of its governing body. A member of the governing body who represents a district and who becomes a resident of another district in the municipality continues to serve until the next regular election unless provided otherwise by ordinance.

Except by ordinance ratified by the voters, no limit may be placed on the total number of terms or number of consecutive terms a voter may serve on the governing body.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Collateral references. —

Validity of requirement that candidate or public officer have been resident of governmental unit for specified period. 65 ALR3d 1048.

Sec. 29.20.150.
Term of office.

A member of the governing body is elected for a three-year term and until a successor qualifies, unless a different term not exceeding four years is prescribed by home rule charter or ordinance.

Except when otherwise required by a change in composition or apportionment, if the term of a member of a governing body is changed by charter or ordinance the term of the member holding office when the change becomes effective is not affected.

The regular term of office begins on the first Monday following certification of the election, unless a different date is prescribed by charter or ordinance.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.160.
Procedures of governing bodies.

The assembly shall elect from among its members a presiding officer and a deputy presiding officer to serve at the pleasure of the members, except that in a borough that has adopted a manager form of government under AS

29.20.460

—

29.20.510

the mayor serves as presiding officer. In a city the mayor serves as presiding officer. If the presiding officer is not present or if the presiding officer is personally disqualified, the deputy presiding officer shall preside.

A governing body shall hold at least one regular meeting each month unless otherwise provided by ordinance. If a majority of the members are given at least 24 hours oral or written notice and reasonable efforts are made to notify all members, a special meeting of the governing body may be held at the call of the presiding officer or at least one-third of the members. A special meeting may be conducted with less than 24 hours notice if all members are present or if absent members have waived in writing the required notice. Waiver of notice can be made before or after the special meeting is held. A waiver of notice shall be made a part of the journal for the meeting.

A majority of the total membership of a governing body authorized by law constitutes a quorum. A member disqualified by law from voting on a question may be considered present for purposes of constituting a quorum. In the absence of a quorum any number of members may recess or adjourn the meeting to a later date.

Actions of a governing body are adopted by a majority of the total membership of the body. Each member present shall vote on every question, unless required to abstain from voting on a question by law. The final vote of each member on each ordinance, resolution, or substantive motion shall be recorded “yes” or “no”, except that if the vote is unanimous it may be recorded “unanimous”.

A governing body shall maintain a journal of its official proceedings that shall be a public record.

To the extent otherwise permitted by law, a governing body may determine by ordinance its own rules of procedure and order of business.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Cross references. —

For open meetings requirements for municipal bodies, see AS

44.62.310

.

Collateral references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 136 et seq.

62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 220 — 246.

Validity, construction, and application of statutes making public proceedings open to the public. 38 ALR3d 1070.

Abstention from voting of member of municipal council present at session as affecting requisite voting majority. 63 ALR3d 1072.

Sec. 29.20.170.
Vacancies.

The governing body may provide by ordinance the manner in which a vacancy occurs in any elected office except the office of mayor or school board member. Unless otherwise provided by ordinance, the governing body shall declare an elective office, other than the office of mayor or school board member, vacant when the person elected

fails to qualify or take office within 30 days after election or appointment;

is physically absent from the municipality for 90 consecutive days unless excused by the governing body;

resigns and the resignation is accepted;

is physically or mentally unable to perform the duties of office as determined by two-thirds vote of the governing body;

is convicted of a felony or of an offense involving a violation of the oath of office;

is convicted of a felony or misdemeanor described in AS 15.56 and two-thirds of the members of the governing body concur in expelling the person elected;

is convicted of a violation of AS 15.13;

no longer physically resides in the municipality and the governing body by two-thirds vote declares the seat vacant; this paragraph does not apply to a member of the governing body who forfeits office under AS

29.20.140(a)

; or

if a member of the governing body, misses three consecutive regular meetings and is not excused.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 37 ch 21 SLA 1991)

Sec. 29.20.180.
Filling a vacancy.

If a vacancy occurs in a governing body, the remaining members shall, within 30 days unless a different period is provided by ordinance, appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy. If less than 30 days remain in a term, a vacancy may not be filled.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, if the membership is reduced to fewer than the number required to constitute a quorum, the remaining members shall, within seven days, appoint a number of qualified persons to constitute a quorum.

A person appointed under this section serves until the next regular election, when a successor shall be elected to serve the balance of the term.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)